src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROP_plc_kpv ! Inanimate proper nouns. Place names
+Sem/Plc: PROP_PLC_01 ;

!@U.Cap.Obl@+Sem/Plc+EOLang/KPV+Sg:@U.Cap.Obl@ CASEPOSSLEX_afterDerivation ;
!@U.Cap.Opt@+Sem/Plc+EOLang/KPV+Sg:@U.Cap.Opt@ DENOMINAL_LOCATIVE_ADJECTIVES ; !!= * **@CODE@** This requires down-casing

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_plc-RUS ! Inanimate proper nouns. Place names
!2018-10-21!+Sem/Plc+Src/F: PROP_ ;
!2018-10-21!@U.Cap.Opt@+Sem/Plc+Src/F+Der+Der/sa:@U.Cap.Opt@%>са A_ ; !!= * __@CODE@__ This requires down-casing

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP-KPV ! Inanimate proper nouns. Place names
!2018-10-21!+EOLang/KPV: PROP_ ;
!2018-10-21!@U.Cap.Opt@+EOLang/KPV+Der+Der/sa:@U.Cap.Opt@%>са A_ ; !!= * __@CODE@__ This requires down-casing

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP-RUS ! Inanimate proper nouns. Place names
!2018-10-21!+EOLang/RUS: PROP_ ;
!2018-10-21!@U.Cap.Opt@+EOLang/RUS+Der+Der/sa:@U.Cap.Opt@%>са A_ ; !!= * __@CODE@__ This requires down-casing

LEXICON PROP_SUB_plc ! Inanimate proper nouns. Place names
+Sem/Plc+Use/NG+Err/Orth: PROP_ ;
!@U.Cap.Opt@+Sem/Plc+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Der+Der/sa:@U.Cap.Opt@%>са A_ ; !!= * __@CODE@__ commented out since it cannot form adj.

!LEXICON PROP_org ! Inanimate proper nouns. Name of organization
!+Sem/Org: PROP_ ;

LEXICON PROP_SUR
PROP_SUR-Mal ;
PROP_SUR-Fem ;

LEXICON PROP_SUR-Mal ! Basic nouns.
+Sem/Sur-Mal: PROP_ ;

LEXICON PROP_mal ! Male given names
+Sem/Mal: PROP_ ;

LEXICON PROP_SUR-Fem ! Basic nouns.
+Sem/Sur-Fem: PROP_ ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP-FEM ! Female given names
!2018-10-21!+Sem/Fem: PROP_ ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_PARAGOGIC
!2018-10-21!: NMN_PARAGOGIC ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_PARAGOGIC-V/L
!2018-10-21!: NMN_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_PARAGOGIC-J !!= * @CODE@ ав:ав авйыс
!2018-10-21!: NMN_PARAGOGIC-J ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_PARAGOGIC-K !!= * @CODE@ кытш:кытш кытшкыс
!2018-10-21!: NMN_PARAGOGIC-K ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_PARAGOGIC-M !!= * @CODE@ зон:зон зонмыс
!2018-10-21!: NMN_PARAGOGIC-M ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_PARAGOGIC-T !!= * @CODE@ зеп:зеп зептыс
!2018-10-21!: NMN_PARAGOGIC-T ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_END-IN-DD1 !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
!2018-10-21!: NMN_END-IN-DD1 ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_END-IN-DDZ !!= * @CODE@ кыдз:кыд
!2018-10-21!: NMN_END-IN-DDZ ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PROP_END-IN-LL1 !!= * @CODE@ моль:мол молльӧ
!2018-10-21!: NMN_END-IN-LL1 ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

 
