src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Авдей+N+Prop:Авдей PROP_mal ;
Авраам+N+Prop:Авраам PROP_mal ;
Агапей+N+Prop:Агапей PROP_mal ;
Агафон+N+Prop:Агафон PROP_mal ;
Адольф+N+Prop:Адольф PROP_mal ;
Азар+N+Prop:Азар PROP_mal ;
Аип+N+Prop:Аип PROP_mal ;
Айипал+N+Prop:Айипал PROP_mal ;
Акам+N+Prop:Акам PROP_mal ;
Аксе+N+Prop:Аксе PROP_mal ;
Аксень+N+Prop:Аксень PROP_mal ;
Александр+N+Prop:Александр PROP_mal "Aleksanteri" ;
Алик+N+Prop:Алик PROP_mal ;
Альберт+N+Prop:Альберт PROP_mal ;
Амвросий+N+Prop:Амвросий PROP_mal ;
Ананий+N+Prop:Ананий PROP_mal ;
Анастас+N+Prop:Анастас PROP_mal ;
Анатолий+N+Prop:Анатолий PROP_mal ;
Андрей+N+Prop:Андрей PROP_mal ;
Андрик+N+Prop:Андрик PROP_mal ;
Андруша+N+Prop:Андруша PROP_mal ;
Антип+N+Prop:Антип PROP_mal ;
Антоней+N+Prop:Антоней PROP_mal ;
Апанасей+N+Prop:Апанасей PROP_mal ;
Апиноген+N+Prop:Апиноген PROP_mal ;
Аполь+N+Prop:Аполь PROP_mal ;
Ардаль+N+Prop:Ардаль PROP_mal ;
Ардаш+N+Prop:Ардаш PROP_mal ;
Аркадий+N+Prop:Аркадий PROP_mal ;
Аркаш+N+Prop:Аркаш PROP_mal ;
Арсе+N+Prop:Арсе PROP_mal ;
Арсен+N+Prop:Арсен PROP_mal ;
Арсентий+N+Prop:Арсентий PROP_mal ;
Арсён+N+Prop:Арсён PROP_mal ;
Арся+N+Prop:Арся PROP_mal ;
Артём+N+Prop:Артём PROP_mal ;
Артип+N+Prop:Артип PROP_mal ;
Архип+N+Prop:Архип PROP_mal ;
Ассекрит+N+Prop:Ассекрит PROP_mal ;
Афоня+N+Prop:Афоня PROP_mal ;
Бартимей+N+Prop:Бартимей PROP_mal ;
Бияр+N+Prop:Бияр PROP_mal "Bijar" ;
Борис+N+Prop:Борис PROP_mal ;
Боря+N+Prop:Боря PROP_mal ;
Вавила+N+Prop:Вавила PROP_mal ;
Вале+N+Prop:Вале PROP_mal ;
Валентин+N+Prop:Валентин PROP_mal ;
Валерий+N+Prop:Валерий PROP_mal ;
Валёк+N+Prop:Валёк PROP_mal ;
Валько+N+Prop:Валько PROP_mal ;
Вань+N+Prop:Вань PROP_mal ;
Ваньчо+N+Prop:Ваньчо PROP_mal ;
Ванюк+N+Prop:Ванюк PROP_mal ;
Ваня+N+Prop:Ваня PROP_mal ;
Варсон+N+Prop:Варсон PROP_mal ;
Варфоломей+N+Prop:Варфоломей PROP_mal ;
Васёнка+N+Prop:Васёнка PROP_mal ;
Василеюшко+N+Prop:Василеюшко PROP_mal ;
Вась+N+Prop:Вась PROP_mal ;
Васько+N+Prop:Васько PROP_mal ;
Васькулей+N+Prop:Васькулей PROP_mal ;
Васюк+N+Prop:Васюк PROP_mal ;
Веденикт+N+Prop:Веденикт PROP_mal ;
Вениамин+N+Prop:Вениамин PROP_mal ;
Венюш+N+Prop:Венюш PROP_mal ;
Венямин+N+Prop:Венямин PROP_mal ;
Веча+N+Prop:Веча PROP_mal ;
Викей+N+Prop:Викей PROP_mal ;
Викентий+N+Prop:Викентий PROP_mal ;
Викеш+N+Prop:Викеш PROP_mal ;
Викул+N+Prop:Викул PROP_mal ;
Виле+N+Prop:Виле PROP_mal ;
Виль+N+Prop:Виль PROP_mal ;
Виссарион+N+Prop:Виссарион PROP_mal ;
Виталий+N+Prop:Виталий PROP_mal ;
Витаха+N+Prop:Витаха PROP_mal ;
Витёк+N+Prop:Витёк PROP_mal ;
Вить+N+Prop:Вить PROP_mal ;
Витя+N+Prop:Витя PROP_mal ;
Влас+N+Prop:Влас PROP_mal ;
Володь+N+Prop:Володь PROP_mal ;
Вони+N+Prop:Вони PROP_mal ;
Всеволод+N+Prop:Всеволод PROP_mal ;
Вячеслав+N+Prop:Вячеслав PROP_mal ;
Галактион+N+Prop:Галактион PROP_mal ;
Генадей+N+Prop:Генадей PROP_mal ;
Генук+N+Prop:Генук PROP_mal ;
Герасим+N+Prop:Герасим PROP_mal ;
Герман+N+Prop:Герман PROP_mal ;
Григорий+N+Prop:Григорий PROP_mal ;
Гришу+N+Prop:Гришу PROP_mal ;
Гурий+N+Prop:Гурий PROP_mal ;
Давук+N+Prop:Давук PROP_mal ;
Данил+N+Prop:Данил PROP_mal ;
Данько+N+Prop:Данько PROP_mal ;
Дементий+N+Prop:Дементий PROP_mal ;
Дене+N+Prop:Дене PROP_mal ;
День+N+Prop:День PROP_mal ;
Диамид+N+Prop:Диамид PROP_mal ;
Дионисий+N+Prop:Дионисий PROP_mal ;
Доля+N+Prop:Доля PROP_mal ;
Дормидонт+N+Prop:Дормидонт PROP_mal ;
Дорук+N+Prop:Дорук PROP_mal ;
Дыма+N+Prop:Дыма PROP_SUR ;
Евгень+N+Prop:Евгень PROP_mal ;
Евлогий+N+Prop:Евлогий PROP_mal ;
Евстафий+N+Prop:Евстафий PROP_mal ;
Евтюш+N+Prop:Евтюш PROP_mal ;
Егорша+N+Prop:Егорша PROP_mal ;
Елизар+N+Prop:Елизар PROP_mal ;
Емельян+N+Prop:Емельян PROP_mal ;
Епифан+N+Prop:Епифан PROP_mal ;
Ерман+N+Prop:Ерман PROP_mal ;
Ермолай+N+Prop:Ермолай PROP_mal ;
Есюк+N+Prop:Есюк PROP_mal ;
Ёрма+N+Prop:Ёрма PROP_mal ;
Закар+N+Prop:Закар PROP_mal ;
Захарий+N+Prop:Захарий PROP_mal ;
Зоей+N+Prop:Зоей PROP_mal ;
Зось+N+Prop:Зось PROP_mal ;
Иван+N+Prop:Иван PROP_mal ;
Ивук+N+Prop:Ивук PROP_mal ;
Игнат+N+Prop:Игнат PROP_mal ;
Игорь+N+Prop:Игорь PROP_mal ;
Изосим+N+Prop:Изосим PROP_mal ;
Илля+N+Prop:Илля PROP_mal ;
Ион+N+Prop:Ион PROP_mal ;
Ипатей+N+Prop:Ипатей PROP_mal ;
Ири+N+Prop:Ири PROP_mal ;
Исидор+N+Prop:Исидор PROP_mal ;
Кадюш+N+Prop:Кадюш PROP_mal ;
Калинник+N+Prop:Калинник PROP_mal ;
Калле+N+Prop:Калле PROP_mal ;
Капит+N+Prop:Капит PROP_mal ;
Карпуш+N+Prop:Карпуш PROP_mal ;
Кипуш+N+Prop:Кипуш PROP_mal ;
Кирил+N+Prop:Кирил PROP_mal ;
Кирьян+N+Prop:Кирьян PROP_mal ;
Колей+N+Prop:Колей PROP_mal ;
Кон+N+Prop:Кон PROP_mal ;
Кондрать+N+Prop:Кондрать PROP_mal ;
Корнил+N+Prop:Корнил PROP_mal ;
Крит+N+Prop:Крит PROP_mal ;
Кузьма+N+Prop:Кузьма PROP_mal ;
Лаврентий+N+Prop:Лаврентий PROP_mal ;
Ладе+N+Prop:Ладе PROP_mal ;
Ладь+N+Prop:Ладь PROP_mal ;
Лар+N+Prop:Лар PROP_mal ;
Ларион+N+Prop:Ларион PROP_mal ;
Ласюк+N+Prop:Ласюк PROP_mal ;
Левонь+N+Prop:Левонь PROP_mal ;
Лень+N+Prop:Лень PROP_mal ;
Лёва+N+Prop:Лёва PROP_mal ;
Лого+N+Prop:Лого PROP_mal ;
Луча+N+Prop:Луча PROP_mal ;
Макся+N+Prop:Макся PROP_mal ;
Маркел+N+Prop:Маркел PROP_mal ;
Мартын+N+Prop:Мартын PROP_mal ;
Мате+N+Prop:Мате PROP_mal ;
Мелек+N+Prop:Мелек PROP_mal ;
Меподь+N+Prop:Меподь PROP_mal ;
Мефодий+N+Prop:Мефодий PROP_mal ;
Микаль+N+Prop:Микаль PROP_mal ;
Микит+N+Prop:Микит PROP_mal ;
Микол+N+Prop:Микол PROP_mal ;
Микул+N+Prop:Микул PROP_mal ;
Мируш+N+Prop:Мируш PROP_mal ;
Мите+N+Prop:Мите PROP_mal ;
Митра+N+Prop:Митра PROP_mal ;
Митрук+N+Prop:Митрук PROP_mal ;
Митю+N+Prop:Митю PROP_mal ;
Михей+N+Prop:Михей PROP_mal ;
Моде+N+Prop:Моде PROP_mal ;
Моисей+N+Prop:Моисей PROP_mal ;
Нестор+N+Prop:Нестор PROP_mal ;
Никадим+N+Prop:Никадим PROP_mal ;
Никита+N+Prop:Никита PROP_mal ;
Никуш+N+Prop:Никуш PROP_mal ;
Оброс+N+Prop:Оброс PROP_mal ;
Онисим+N+Prop:Онисим PROP_mal ;
Онча+N+Prop:Онча PROP_mal ;
Опоня+N+Prop:Опоня PROP_mal ;
Ортя+N+Prop:Ортя PROP_mal ;
Осипа+N+Prop:Осипа PROP_mal ;
Офань+N+Prop:Офань PROP_mal ;
Офонь+N+Prop:Офонь PROP_mal ;
Паком+N+Prop:Паком PROP_mal ;
Палюк+N+Prop:Палюк PROP_mal ;
Панкуш+N+Prop:Панкуш PROP_mal ;
Пантик+N+Prop:Пантик PROP_mal ;
Панько+N+Prop:Панько PROP_mal ;
Патрикей+N+Prop:Патрикей PROP_mal ;
Паш+N+Prop:Паш PROP_mal ;
Педот+N+Prop:Педот PROP_mal ;
Педь+N+Prop:Педь PROP_mal ;
Пеопан+N+Prop:Пеопан PROP_mal ;
Петру+N+Prop:Петру PROP_mal ;
Петруша+N+Prop:Петруша PROP_mal ;
Петю+N+Prop:Петю PROP_mal ;
Пётр+N+Prop:Пётр PROP_mal ;
Пиле+N+Prop:Пиле PROP_mal ;
Пиль+N+Prop:Пиль PROP_mal ;
Пиок+N+Prop:Пиок PROP_mal ;
Питю+N+Prop:Питю PROP_mal ;
Плегон+N+Prop:Плегон PROP_mal ;
Подь+N+Prop:Подь PROP_mal ;
Поликарп+N+Prop:Поликарп PROP_mal ;
Пома+N+Prop:Пома PROP_mal ;
Потюк+N+Prop:Потюк PROP_mal ;
Прокофий+N+Prop:Прокофий PROP_mal ;
Пролук+N+Prop:Пролук PROP_mal ;
Протасий+N+Prop:Протасий PROP_mal ;
Родя+N+Prop:Родя PROP_mal ;
Ростислав+N+Prop:Ростислав PROP_mal ;
Сав+N+Prop:Сав PROP_mal ;
Савать+N+Prop:Савать PROP_mal ;
Самук+N+Prop:Самук PROP_mal ;
Сандыр+N+Prop:Сандыр PROP_mal ;
Саш+N+Prop:Саш PROP_mal ;
Севолод+N+Prop:Севолод PROP_mal ;
Селиван+N+Prop:Селиван PROP_mal ;
Селько+N+Prop:Селько PROP_mal ;
Семен+N+Prop:Семен PROP_mal ;
Сенипонт+N+Prop:Сенипонт PROP_mal ;
Серапион+N+Prop:Серапион PROP_mal ;
Сергунь+N+Prop:Сергунь PROP_mal ;
Сивер+N+Prop:Сивер PROP_mal ;
Силантий+N+Prop:Силантий PROP_mal ;
Силуян+N+Prop:Силуян PROP_mal ;
Симон+N+Prop:Симон PROP_mal ;
Созук+N+Prop:Созук PROP_mal ;
Спиридон+N+Prop:Спиридон PROP_mal ;
Стахей+N+Prop:Стахей PROP_mal ;
Стёп+N+Prop:Стёп PROP_mal ;
Тер+N+Prop:Тер PROP_mal ;
Тим+N+Prop:Тим PROP_mal ;
Тимофей+N+Prop:Тимофей PROP_mal ;
Тит+N+Prop:Тит PROP_mal ;
Толик+N+Prop:Толик PROP_mal ;
Толя+N+Prop:Толя PROP_mal ;
Трипиль+N+Prop:Трипиль PROP_mal ;
Трифан+N+Prop:Трифан PROP_mal ;
Тропим+N+Prop:Тропим PROP_mal ;
Фалалей+N+Prop:Фалалей PROP_mal ;
Федот+N+Prop:Федот PROP_mal ;
Федько+N+Prop:Федько PROP_mal ;
Феоктист+N+Prop:Феоктист PROP_mal ;
Филат+N+Prop:Филат PROP_mal ;
Фока+N+Prop:Фока PROP_mal ;
Фотим+N+Prop:Фотим PROP_mal ;
Чопа+N+Prop:Чопа PROP_mal ;
Эдуард+N+Prop:Эдуард PROP_mal ;
Юрий+N+Prop:Юрий PROP_mal ;
Як+N+Prop:Як PROP_mal ;
Ярафим+N+Prop:Ярафим PROP_mal ;
Ярук+N+Prop:Ярук PROP_mal ;
